Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202681-1848.01
Appeal; notification required.

(1) Upon the filing of an appeal by the defendant, the county attorney upon whom notice of appeal was served shall notify the Attorney General in writing of the name and last-known address of any victim as defined in section 81-1848.

(2) The Attorney General shall notify the victim of the following:

(a) That the defendant has filed an appeal of the conviction;

(b) A brief explanation of the appeal process, including possible dispositions;

(c) Whether the defendant has been released on bail or other recognizance pending the disposition of the appeal;

(d) The time and place of any appellate proceedings and any changes in the time or place of those proceedings;

(e) The result of the appeal; and

(f) The final disposition of the case within thirty days after the final disposition.

(3) In the event the defendant's conviction is reversed and the case is remanded to the trial court for further proceedings, the victim has the same rights as he or she had during the previous proceedings which led to the appeal.

Laws 2004, LB 270, § 12;

Laws 2026, LB1181, § 7.
July 18, 2026